District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-3205

Incorporation of certain existing D.C. Code sections.

Repealed.

Mar. 16, 1978, D.C. Law 2-58, § 105, 24 DCR 5765
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Aug. 12, 1998, D.C. Law 12-142, § 3(i), 45 DCR 4826
1981 Ed., § 47-3205.
1973 Ed., § 47-3105.